Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 7. Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act.

§ 55.1-653.
Where notices and certificates affecting liens to be filed.

Notices of liens, certificates, and other notices affecting federal tax liens or other federal liens shall be filed in accordance with this article.

Notices of liens upon real property for obligations payable to the United States and certificates and notices affecting the liens, including certificates of redemption, shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the circuit court of the county or city in which the real property subject to the lien is situated.

Notices of liens upon personal property, whether tangible or intangible, for obligations payable to the United States and certificates and notices affecting the liens shall be filed as follows:

If the person against whose interest the lien applies is a corporation or a partnership whose principal executive office is in the Commonwealth, as these entities are defined in the internal revenue laws of the United States, in the office of the clerk of the State Corporation Commission.

In all other cases, in the office of the clerk of the circuit court of the county or city (i) where the person against whose interest the lien applies resides or (ii) in the case of a trust or a decedent’s estate, having jurisdiction over the qualification of the trustee or probate of the will, at the time of filing of the notice of lien.

History.

1970, c. 76, § 55-142.1; 1986, c. 299; 1988, cc. 113, 388; 2019, c. 712.

Uniform law cross references.

For other signatory state provisions, see:

Alabama: Code of Ala. §§ 35-11-42 to 35-11-48.

Alaska: Alaska Stat. §§ 40.19.010 to 40.19.050.

Arizona: A.R.S. §§ 33-1031 to 33-1035.

Arkansas: A.C.A. §§ 18-47-201 to 18-47-207.

California: California Civ. Proc. Code §§ 2100 to 2107.

Colorado: C.R.S. §§ 38-25-101 to 38-25-107.

Florida: Fla. Stat. § 713.901.

Hawaii: HRS § 505-1 et seq.

Idaho: Idaho Code §§ 45-201 to 45-207.

Illinois: 770 I.L.C.S. 110/1 to 110/7.

Iowa: Iowa Code § 331.609.

Kansas: K.S.A. §§ 79-2613 to 79-2619.

Louisiana: La. R.S. §§ 52:51 to 52:56.

Maine: 33 M.R.S. §§ 1901 to 1907.

Maryland: Md. Real Property Code Ann. §§ 3-401 to 3-405.

Michigan: M.C.L.S. §§ 211.661 to 211.668.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat. §§ 272.479 and 272.481 to 272.488.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann. §§ 85-8-1 to 85-8-15.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno. §§ 71-3-201 to 71-3-207.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb. §§ 52-1001 to 52-1008.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 108.825 to 108.837.

New Hampshire: R.S.A. § 454-B:1 to 454-B:10.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann. §§ 48-1-1 to 48-1-7.

New York: NY CLS Lien §§ 240 to 245.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat. §§ 44-68.10 to 44-68.17.

North Dakota: N.D. Cent. Code §§ 35-29-01 to 35-29-06.

Oklahoma: 68 Okl. St. §§ 3401 to 3407.

Oregon: O.R.S. §§ 87.806 to 87.831.

Pennsylvania: 74 P.S. §§ 157-1 to 157-8.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann. § 12-57-10 et seq.

Texas: Tex. Prop. Code §§ 14.001 to 14.007.

Washington: Rev. Code Wash. §§ 60.68.005 to 60.68.903.

West Virginia: W. Va. Code §§ 38-10A-1 to 38-10A-5.

Wisconsin: Wis. Stat. § 779.97.

Wyoming: Wyo. Stat. §§ 29-6-201 to 29-6-208.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For survey of recent legislation on taxation and Virginia’s adoption of the Uniform Federal Tax Lien Registration Act, see 5 U. Rich. L. Rev. 200 (1970).

For note, “Jackson Reanalyzed: Preventing Tax-Free Escape Upon Transfer of a Partnership Interest,” see 26 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 317 (1985).

For article, “Environmental Liens and Title Insurance,” see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 305 (1989).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 2.

§ 55.1-654.
Certification of notices and certificates.

Certification of notices of tax liens, certificates, or other notices affecting federal liens by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States or his delegate or by any official or entity of the United States responsible for filing or certifying notice of any lien other than a tax lien entitles them to be filed, and no other attestation, certification, or acknowledgment is necessary.

History.

1970, c. 76, § 55-142.2; 1988, cc. 113, 388; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 2.

§ 55.1-655.
Duties of filing officers.

If a notice of federal lien, a refiling of a notice of federal lien, or a notice of revocation of any certificate described in subsection B is presented to the filing officer and:

He is the clerk of the State Corporation Commission, he shall cause the notice to be marked, held, and indexed in accordance with the provisions of §

8.9A-519

as if the notice were a financing statement as defined in §

8.9A-102

; or

He is any other officer described in §

55.1-653

, he shall endorse thereon his identification and the date and time of receipt and file it alphabetically or enter it in an alphabetical index showing the name and address of the person named in the notice, the date and time of receipt, the serial number of the district director in the case of tax liens, and the total amount appearing on the notice of lien, and he shall index and record the same where judgments are indexed and recorded.

If a certificate of release, nonattachment, discharge, or subordination of any lien is presented to the clerk of the State Corporation Commission for filing, he shall:

Cause a certificate of release or nonattachment to be marked, held, and indexed as if the certificate were a termination statement within the meaning of §

8.9A-513

, except that the notice of lien to which the certificate relates shall not be removed from the files; and

Cause a certificate of discharge or subordination to be held, marked, and indexed as if the certificate were a release of collateral within the meaning of §

8.9A-512

.

If a refiled notice of federal lien referred to in subsection A or any of the certificates or notices referred to in subsection B is presented for filing to any other filing officer specified in §

55.1-653

, he shall permanently attach the refiled notice or the certificate to the original notice of lien and shall enter the refiled notice or the certificate with the date of filing in any alphabetical lien index on the line where the original notice of lien is entered.

Upon request of any person, the filing officer shall issue his certificate showing whether there is on file, on the date and hour stated therein, any notice of lien or certificate or notice affecting any lien filed under this article, naming a particular person, and if a notice or certificate is on file, giving the date and hour of filing of each notice or certificate. The fee for a certificate is $1. Upon request, the filing officer shall furnish a copy of any notice of federal tax lien or notice or certificate affecting a federal lien for a fee of 50 cents ($0.50) per page.

History.

1970, c. 76, § 55-142.3; 1988, cc. 113, 388; 2014, c. 291; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 2.

§ 55.1-656.
Fees of filing officers other than clerk of State Corporation Commission.

The fee to be paid to any officer other than the clerk of the State Corporation Commission for filing and indexing each notice of lien or certificate or notice affecting the lien or providing a copy of such notice or certificate of such notice is $5.

The officer shall bill the district directors of internal revenue or other appropriate federal officials on a monthly basis for fees for documents filed by them.

History.

1970, c. 76, § 55-142.4; 1988, cc. 113, 388; 1993, c. 43; 1994, c. 432; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 2.

§ 55.1-657.
Fees of clerk of State Corporation Commission.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the fees for filing, indexing, searching, or amending or for certificates of discharge or subordination or any other fee that may be chargeable by the clerk of the State Corporation Commission shall be the same as those permitted to be charged according to the schedule of fees maintained by the clerk of the State Corporation Commission.

History.

1970, c. 76, § 55-142.5; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 2.

§ 55.1-658.
Construction of article.

This article shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact it.

History.

1970, c. 76, § 55-142.6; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 2.

§ 55.1-659.
Certificates and notices affecting liens filed on or before July 1, 1970.

If a notice of lien was filed on or before July 1, 1970, any certificate or notice affecting the lien shall be filed in the same office.

History.

1970, c. 76, § 55-142.8; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 2.

§ 55.1-660.
No action to be brought against the State Corporation Commission or its staff.

No action shall be brought against the State Corporation Commission or any member of the staff of the State Corporation Commission claiming damage for alleged errors or omissions in the performance of the duties imposed by this article on the State Corporation Commission.

History.

1970, c. 76, § 55-142.9; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 2.